Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1254.01
Boating
under influence of alcoholic liquor or drug; city
or village ordinances; violation;
penalty.

(1) No person shall be in
the actual physical control of any motorboat or personal watercraft under propulsion upon
the waters of this state:

(a) While under the influence of alcoholic
liquor or of any drug;

(b) When such person has a concentration of eight-hundredths
of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of his
or her blood; or

(c) When such person has a concentration of eight-hundredths
of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of his
or her breath.

(2) Any city or village may
enact ordinances in conformance with this section and section 37-1254.02. Upon conviction of any person of a violation
of such a city or village ordinance, the provisions of sections 37-1254.11
and 37-1254.12 shall be applicable the same as though it were a violation
of this section or section 37-1254.02.

(3) Any person
who is in the actual physical control of any motorboat or personal watercraft
under propulsion upon the waters of this state while in a condition described
in subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a crime and upon conviction
punished as provided in section 37-1254.12.

Laws 1989, LB 195, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 166, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 773, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 10.